District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0328.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Vehicular Terrorism Prevention Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Title II of An Act To authorize the District of Columbia government to establish
an Office of Civil Defense, and for other purposes, effective March 14, 2007 (D.C. Law 16-262;
D.C. Official Code § 7-2231.01 et seq.) is amended by adding a new section 212 to read as
follows:
“Sec. 212. Roadway barrier safety standards.


“(a) Except as provided in subsection (d), any special event, as defined in 24 DCMR §
720.1, or other temporary event permitted by the Mayor requiring the closure of a public
roadway to vehicle traffic shall be subject to the requirements of this section.
“(b) The Homeland Security and Emergency Management Agency shall, in consultation
with the District Department of Transportation (“DDOT”), promulgate rules to establish roadway
barrier standards for closure of a public roadway to vehicle traffic.
“(1) The standards shall:
“(A) Specify distinct, appropriate barrier standards for each road typology
as defined in the DDOT Functional Classification Map;
“(B) Include clear thresholds for the safety rating of standard barriers, as
measured by:
“(i) The Dynamic Penetration Rating as measured by the ASTM
International “Standard Test Method for Crash Testing of Vehicle Security Barriers” (ASTM
F2656), or any ASTM International standard that supercedes it; or
“(ii) Barricade types as prescribed by the current edition of the
Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices for Streets and Highways, Part 6, as approved by
the Federal Highway Administration;
“(C) For roadways classified as a collector or arterial, prioritze the use of
barriers that have attained certification as a Qualified Anti-Terrorism Technology by the United
States Department of Homeland Security, pursuant to the Support Anti-terrorism by Fostering
Effective Technologies Act of 2002, approved November 25, 2002 (116 Stat. 2238, 6 USC § 441
et seq.), as well as certification in favor of the government contractor defense, as defined in
section 863(d) of that Act;


“(D) Reduce the need for District employees to be deployed to special
events exclusively or primarily to effectuate closure of a roadway to vehicle traffic, as opposed
to performing other public safety functions;
“(E) Incorporate the following considerations:
“(i) Relevant crash test data and other metrics on the mitigation of
vehicle ramming attacks;
“(ii) The safety impacts of using motor vehicles as roadway
barriers;
“(iii) Best practices in roadway closure materials and procedures,
based on a review of peer jurisdictions.
“(2) The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of
review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council
does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution within this
45-day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed disapproved.
“(c) The Mayor shall not deny a permit for the temporary closure of a public roadway to
vehicle traffic based solely on the grounds of proposed roadway closure barriers, provided that
the proposed barriers meet standards established pursuant to subsection (b).
“(d) Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (c), the following shall be exempt from the
requirements of this section:
“(1) Public right-of-way occupancy permits, as defined in 24 DCMR § 3400 et
seq., or any other public roadway closures necessary for construction, excavation, or public
space management;


“(2) Closure of a public roadway designated as a freeway, expressway, Interstate
Highway, or any bridges;
“(3) First Amendment activities that do not require the Mayor’s approval as a
special event; and
“(4) A National Special Security Event as defined in 18 U.S.C. § 3056 or other
event involving deployment of Federal law enforcement in coordination with the District.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the Mayor,
action by the Council to override the veto), and shall remain in effect for no longer than 90 days,
as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in section 412(a) of
the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788; D.C.
Official Code § 1-204.12(a)).